Utah statutes.
10-8-8.6.   Widening a street or alley.

Before a city may widen a street or alley in such a way that access to underground facilities is affected, the city shall notify in writing, and consult with, the owners or operators of the underground facilities, as defined in Section 54-8a-2, and utility facilities within the street or alley.



Enacted by Chapter 180, 1995 General Session

